Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.060

Rule making—Inspection of cigarettes.

(1) The state director of fire protection may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

(2) The department of revenue in the regular course of conducting inspections of wholesale dealers, agents, and retail dealers, as authorized under chapter 82.24 RCW, may inspect cigarettes to determine if the cigarettes are marked as required by RCW 19.305.040. If the cigarettes are not marked as required, the department of revenue shall notify the state director of fire protection.

[ 2008 c 239 s 6.]